District of Columbia statutes.
2-424

Application of subchapter — Date of release.

This subchapter shall apply to any person whose release from unjust imprisonment occurred on or after June 1, 1979: Provided, that the provisions of § 12-309 shall not apply to any cause of action for unjust imprisonment arising prior to the effective date of this subchapter.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-143, § 5, 27 DCR 4656
1981 Ed., § 1-1224.